Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.973

State law enforcement mobilization—State law enforcement coordinator—Duties.

(1) The state law enforcement resource coordinator, or alternate, shall serve in that capacity for the duration of the mobilization.

(2) The duties of the coordinator are to:

(a) Coordinate the mobilization of law enforcement and other support resources within a region;

(b) Be primarily responsible for the coordination of resources in conjunction with the regional law enforcement mobilization committees, in the case of incidents involving more than one region or when resources from more than one region must be mobilized; and

(c) Advise and consult with the chief regarding what resources are required in response to the emergency or disaster and in regard to when the mobilization should end.

[ 2003 c 405 s 9.]